Utah statutes.
52-7-102.   "Public officer" defined.

As used in this chapter:

"Public officer" means a member of the Utah State Senate, a member of the Utah State House of Representatives, the governor, lieutenant governor, state auditor, state treasurer, attorney general, or any justice or judge of a court of record.

